Hawaii, session 2026, HB1676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that artificial intelligence has the potential to support personalized learning, reduce educator workload, and expand access for rural and underserved communities.  However, unregulated or inequitable deployment may exacerbate existing disparities, undermine student privacy, or reduce human interaction in the learning process. The purpose of this Act is to establish statewide guidance, safeguards, and supports for the responsible integration of artificial intelligence in Hawaii's public schools and public institutions of higher education by establishing: (1)  An artificial intelligence in education task force; and (2)  Procurement and use standards for artificial intelligence tools. PART II SECTION 2.  (a) There is established within the department of education for administrative purposes an artificial intelligence in education task force. (b)  The superintendent of education, or the superintendent's designee, shall be the chair of the artificial intelligence in education task force. (c)  The artificial intelligence in education task force shall be composed of representatives from the following entities, to be designated by the agency's executive officer or designee: (1)  The university of Hawaii; (2)  Hawaiʻi P-20 Partnerships for Education; (3)  Hawaii State Teachers Association, including representatives of rural communities and the neighbor islands; and (4)  Public school administrators, including representatives of rural communities and the neighbor islands. (d)  The chair of the artificial intelligence in education task force shall invite the following individuals to participate in the task force: (1)  Students of department of education schools in the State; (2)  Students of the university of Hawaii; (3)  A data-privacy expert or civil rights expert; (4)  A Native Hawaiian education specialist; and (5)  Technology and cybersecurity professionals. (e)  The artificial intelligence in education task force shall develop: (1)  Model statewide guidance on the use of artificial intelligence as an instructional tool, including recommended human-in-the-loop practices; (2)  Data privacy and vendor transparency standards, including disclosure of training datasets, bias testing, and audit provisions; (3)  Digital equity recommendations for rural schools and campuses in the counties of Hawaii, Maui, and Kauai; (4)  Professional-development guidelines for educators integrating artificial intelligence into teaching; and (5)  A framework for evaluating student learning outcomes in artificial intelligence-supported classrooms. (f) The members of the artificial intelligence in education task force shall serve without compensation but may be entitled to reimbursement for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. (g) The artificial intelligence in education task force shall submit reports of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than December 1 of 2027, 2028, and 2029. (h) The artificial intelligence in education task force shall cease to exist on December 31, 2029. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the artificial intelligence in education task force. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. PART III SECTION 4.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Artificial intelligence tools; procurement; usage.  Before the procurement or use of an artificial intelligence tool, the superintendent shall obtain from the vendor for the artificial intelligence tool documentation certifying: (1)  Student-data privacy compliance; (2)  Information on training datasets and bias-mitigation testing; (3)  Auditability of outputs by demographic group; and (4)  Transparent reporting of limitations and risks." SECTION 5.  Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§304A-     Artificial intelligence tools; procurement; usage.  Before the procurement or use of an artificial intelligence tool, the chief financial officer shall obtain from the vendor for the artificial intelligence tool documentation certifying: (1)  Student-data privacy compliance; (2)  Information on training datasets and bias-mitigation testing; (3)  Auditability of outputs by demographic group; and (4)  Transparent reporting of limitations and risks." PART IV SECTION 6.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________